Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8217.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 41-3.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 41-3.1 entitled "Dog Racing
in Burrillville, Lincoln, and West Greenwich" is hereby amended to read as follows:
41-3.1-3. Regulation of operations.
(a) The division of gaming and athletics licensing is hereby authorized to license dog racing
in the towns of Burrillville, Lincoln, and West Greenwich. The operation of a dog track shall be
under the division’s supervision. The division is hereby authorized to issue rules and regulations
for the supervision of the operations, and the regulations are to be issued prior to commencement
of licensing hearings.
(b) Any license granted under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the rules
and regulations promulgated by the division and shall be subject to suspension or revocation for
any cause that the division shall deem sufficient after giving the licensee a reasonable opportunity
for a hearing at which he or she shall have the right to be represented by counsel. If any license is
suspended or revoked, the division shall state the reasons for the suspension or revocation and cause
an entry of the reasons to be made on the record books of the division.
(c) The division of gaming and athletics licensing in the department of business regulation
shall be prohibited from licensing dog racing and/or the operation of a dog track upon which dog
racing occurs in the town of Lincoln. Any license having been issued and in effect as of the effective
date of this section shall be null and void and any licensee shall be prohibited from operating

thereunder; provided, however, that the following entities shall be deemed pari-mutuel licensees as
defined in § 42-61.2-1 et seq. and licensees as defined in § 41-11-1 et seq.: (1) Any entity having
been issued a license to operate a dog track prior to December 31, 2008; and (2) Any entity having
been issued a license to operate a dog track prior to December 31, 2008, that after that date is
reorganized under a confirmed plan of reorganization pursuant to chapter 11 of title 11 of the United
States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. §§ 101 — 1532); and provided, further, that in the case of a
reorganized licensee under clause (2), its application for a facility permit license is approved and
issued by the department of business regulation in the event of a proposed change in control of the
entity. Nothing herein shall limit the ability of the department of business regulation, in connection
with a proposed change in control, to investigate and subject to the regulatory due diligence process,
any holder of an ownership interest regardless of percentage of ownership held.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision of the general laws to the contrary, effective January 1,
2027, no person may wager money or any other thing of value on the outcome of a greyhound race
or other dog race, or accept or facilitate such wagering, regardless of the location at which the race
takes place.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004893
========
LC004893 - Page 2 of 3